Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 6 Shellfish

20-6-1.
Taking of shellfish without a license.

Unless otherwise specified in regulations adopted by the marine fisheries council, any resident of this state may, without a license, take in any one day during the open season, if applicable, not more than one half (1/2) bushel each of quahaugs, soft-shell clams, sea clams, oysters, and mussels, and not more than one bushel of scallops; provided, that those quahaugs, soft-shell clams, sea clams, oysters, mussels, or scallops shall not be sold or offered for sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-2.
Oysters — Open season.

Unless otherwise specified in regulations adopted by the marine fisheries council, the open season for taking oysters from the free and common oyster fisheries in any of the waters of this state shall be between the fifteenth day of September and the fifteenth day of May. Any person taking any oysters or exposing any oysters for sale taken from the free and common fisheries in state waters in violation of the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be fined no less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and costs for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-3.
Scallops — Open season.

Unless otherwise specified in regulations adopted by the director, in consultations with the marine fisheries council, the open season for taking scallops from the free and common scallop fisheries in any of the waters of the state shall be between sunrise of the first day of October and sunset on the last day of December of every year. Any person taking scallops in violation of this section shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned exceeding thirty (30) days for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 9.

20-6-4.
Registration of boats and display of numbers.

No boat shall be used in the taking of quahaugs by dredge or the commercial taking of scallops unless that boat has been registered with the director of environmental management. Each registered boat shall be issued a certificate of registration and assigned a number, and this number shall be displayed on a flat surface in a conspicuous place upon the port side while the boat is engaged in taking quahaugs or scallops.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-5.
Registered boat operated only by licensee.

Each boat registered pursuant to §

20-6-4

shall be operated only by the person to whom that boat was registered; provided that person is duly licensed for the activity engaged in. Each registered boat used shall be limited, no matter how many persons are on board, to the catch limit established for one licensee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-6.
Registration of boat used in taking of molluscan shellfish.

Each boat used in the commercial taking of oysters, soft-shell clams, surf clams, mussels, or quahaugs, other than by dredging, shall be registered with the director of environmental management. Upon registration, and the payment of a fee of two dollars ($2.00), the boat shall be issued a registration number to be displayed on the boat while engaged in shellfishing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-7.
Use of dredges.

Except as hereinafter provided and unless otherwise specified by regulation of the marine fisheries council, no person shall take any oysters, bay quahaugs, or soft-shell clams from the waters of this state by dredges, rakes, or other apparatus operated by mechanical power or hauled by power boats. No licensed person shall cast, haul, or have overboard any dredges while fishing for oysters, bay quahaugs, or soft-shell clams from the free and common fisheries of this state, nor shall any licensed boat be used for fishing oysters, soft-shell clams, or bay quahaugs with dredges, except as provided in this section; provided, that any person having a license issued under this title for the taking of scallops may use a dredge or dredges, not exceeding six (6) in number nor exceeding twenty-eight inches (28") each in width, for that purpose; provided further, that the licensee shall immediately return all oysters, soft-shell clams, or bay quahaugs caught by the licensee to the waters from which they were taken. Any licensed boat may be used in dredging for mussels by the licensee of that boat, the licensee having first obtained a permit from the director of environmental management allowing the licensee so to do; provided, the licensee, while dredging for mussels under the permit granted the licensee by the director, shall immediately return all oysters, scallops, or bay quahaugs caught by him or her to the waters from which they were taken. The fact of any licensed person being found with oysters, scallops, or bay quahaugs in his or her possession while dredging for mussels shall be prima facie evidence that person was fishing in violation of the provisions of this chapter and shall be subject to the penalties and fines imposed by this chapter. Any resident dredging for surf clams or skimmers shall not be in violation of this section if that dredging is done southerly of the coastline of Little Compton, southerly of a line extending from Church point, in the town of Little Compton, to Flint point on Aquidneck Island, southerly of the coastline of Aquidneck Island, southerly of a line extending from Castle Hill point on Aquidneck Island, to southwest point of Conanicut Island to Bonnet point, Narragansett, easterly of the coastline of the town of Narragansett, southerly of the coastline of the towns of Narragansett, South Kingstown, and Charlestown, and westerly to the Connecticut line. For the purpose of this section, “coastline” refers to the land facing the open sea.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-8.
Opening areas for quahaug dredging.

Pursuant to good conservation practices, the marine fisheries council shall be authorized to open areas of the public waters of the state for taking quahaugs under license by a registered boat, by dredges, rakes, or other apparatus operated by mechanical power or hauled by power boats, and shall be authorized to close those areas at any time there is a danger of depletion of quahaugs or when flagrant violations of this chapter occur.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-9.
Penalty for exceeding allowance without license.

Every person taking in any one day more than one half (1/2) bushel each of oysters, bay quahaugs, soft-shell clams, sea clams, or mussels from the free and common fisheries of this state, without a license, shall be fined, upon conviction, not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) and costs for each one half (1/2) bushel or fraction thereof above the stated limits or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-10.
Allowance of shellfish taking under license.

Unless otherwise specified by regulation of the marine fisheries council, a holder of a commercial shellfishing license may take and/or possess, in any one day, up to twelve (12) bushels of quahaugs, twelve (12) bushels of soft-shell clams, and three (3) bushels of oysters.

A holder of a nonresident shellfishing license may take in any one day not more than one peck each of oysters, quahaugs, soft-shell clams, surf clams, or mussels. Any person taking more than these allowances in any one day shall be fined upon conviction one hundred dollars ($100) for each bushel or part of a bushel exceeding the prescribed quantity or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 254, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 27.

20-6-11.
Minimum size of shellfish — Penalty.

No person shall take and/or possess any quahogs less than one inch (1") shell thickness (hinge width). In addition, no person shall take and/or possess soft-shell clams, taken from the free and common soft-shell clam fisheries, of a diameter less than one and one half inches (11/2") taking the maximum shell diameter, or any oysters, taken from the free and common oyster fisheries, measuring less than three inches (3") measured parallel to the long axis of the oyster, unless greater minimum sizes are established by the director, in consultation with the marine fisheries council. Any person who takes and/or possesses shellfish of less than the minimum size, as delineated above, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each and every fifteen (15) shellfish taken. Additionally, any person who takes and/or possesses shellfish of less than the minimum size commingled and/or otherwise stored or contained with shellfish of not less than the minimum size, where the percentage of the less than minimum size shellfish is not less than ten percent (10%) of the total piece count of the commingled and/or otherwise stored or contained package, shipment, or container, shall be subject to seizure and/or forfeiture of the entire commingled and/or otherwise stored or contained package, shipment, or container, in accordance with the provisions of §§

20-1-8(a)(5)

and (a)(6) and

20-1-8.1

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) above, the director of the department of environmental management is authorized to promulgate regulations establishing a special exemption permit that would exempt department of health-licensed food processing facilities from the one-inch-minimum (1") size restriction governing bay quahogs. The exemption permit may only apply to frozen, packaged, cultured bay quahog products shipped into Rhode Island for redistribution outside of the state. The regulations shall prescribe the procedures to apply for the exemption permit and the standards to be employed by the director in his or her consideration of the application. The regulations shall prescribe rules governing the conduct and operation of the facility and may include restrictions on product forms, sizes, possession requirements, and other provisions in order to maintain the protection of the quahog resource and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 507, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 27.

20-6-12.
Maximum take for dredged quahaugs.

Any person licensed to take quahaugs by dredge, rake, or other apparatus operated by power or hauled by a power boat may take and possess, between sunrise and sunset of any one day, thirty (30) bushels of quahaugs, unless a different amount is specified by regulation of the marine fisheries council. Any person taking more than the prescribed quantity shall be fined, upon conviction, not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each bushel exceeding the prescribed quantity or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-13.
General penalties for violations — Impoundment of boats.

Any person who, without a license, takes quahaugs by dredge, or any person who violates any suspension of the director of environmental management made with respect to quahaug dredging or who violates any provisions of this chapter for which a penalty is not otherwise provided, shall, upon conviction for the first offense, be fined two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and the director may seize, hold, and impound, at the owner’s expense, in one of three (3) commercial shipyards submitting the lowest bid, for a period of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days, any power boat used in the violation of this section together with its dredges, rakes, and equipment. Any person convicted of a subsequent violation, or violations, of the provisions of this section shall be imprisoned for thirty (30) days and the director of environmental management may seize, hold, and impound, at the owner’s expense, in a commercial shipyard for a period of not less than ninety (90) nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days, any power boat used in the violation of this chapter together with its dredges, rakes, and equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-14.
Costs of seizure and impounding.

Any costs incurred by the seizure and impounding of power boats by authority of §

20-6-13

shall be assessed against the owner, or owners, of those boats, and none of these seized and impounded boats shall be released to any claimant, unless and until, any costs incurred by reason of their seizure and impounding shall have been paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-15.
Soft-shell clams — Method of taking.

No person, either as principal, agent, or employee, shall dig or take by any method other than by forks, rakes, hoes, tongs, or any other device operated by hand, from any of the waters of this state, any soft-shell clam. Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not less than ten ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-16.
Scallops — Commercial allowance.

Unless otherwise specified by regulation of the marine fisheries council, a person holding a license for the commercial taking of scallops shall take in any one day not more than ten (10) bushels of scallops, including shells, from the waters of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-17.
Taking and possession of seed scallops.

Every person taking any seed scallops, and failing to restore them as soon as possible to their natural beds in the water from which taken, shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both, for each offense. For the purpose of this chapter, a “seed scallop” means a scallop with a bright, thin, slightly curved shell with no foreign adherent, the shell having no well-defined raised annual growth line, and the scallop being less than one year old.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-18.
Sale of scallops during closed season.

Any person offering for sale any scallops, other than during the open season for taking scallops, shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each quart offered for sale, or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both; provided, however, it shall be lawful to possess or offer for sale frozen scallops legally taken.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-19.
Number, size, and handling of dredges.

Unless otherwise specified by regulation of the marine fisheries council, no person engaged in the taking of scallops shall use more than six (6) single dredges, the blades of which shall not be more than twenty-eight inches (28") in width, and the bag used shall not be more than thirty-six inches (36") in length. Every single dredge shall be towed and hauled aboard the registered boat individually.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-20.
Towing of dredge during closed season.

Any person who tows a scallop dredge in the waters of the state during the season closed to the taking of scallops shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both, for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-21.
Opening shellfish on water.

No person shall possess the meats of more than six (6) shellfish while shellfishing on the waters of the state or throw the shells of open scallops onto the scallop beds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 254, § 3.

20-6-22.
Transplanting of seed scallops.

The director of environmental management may conduct any scallop transplant programs as may be appropriate to enhance scallop stock, seed depleted areas, and further the scallop harvest in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-23.
Penalty for taking shellfish at night.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, any person who takes any oysters, clams, quahaugs, scallops, or mussels from any of the waters of this state during the hours between sundown and sunrise shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment not exceeding three (3) years, or both; and any boat, dredges, rakes, or other equipment used in this violation shall be forfeited to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 166, § 1.

20-6-24.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 173, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 214, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 7, effective July 6, 2021.

20-6-25.
Disposition of moneys received under this chapter.

All moneys derived from payments received for fishing licenses required under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited with the general treasurer, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it deems necessary for the protection, cultivation, research, and management of shellfish; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for payment of any sums that may be necessary, from time to time, upon receipt by the controller of duly authenticated vouchers presented by the director of the department of environmental management; provided, however, nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive the licensing agents of their recording fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-26.
Transfer of shellfish from uncertified waters.

The director of environmental management is authorized and directed, after requiring all necessary safeguards, to transfer shellfish from uncertified waters of the state to approved areas. The director may make rules and regulations governing the reharvest of those shellfish to the best economical benefit of the state after all necessary safeguards to insure their cleanliness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-27.
Dredging, raking, and tonging.

Those areas to which the shellfish are transferred shall be marked out and dredging, raking, or tonging on them shall be prohibited except under the special direction of the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 166, § 1.

20-6-28.
Cost of transfer of shellfish.

For the transfer of shellfish pursuant to §

20-6-26

, the director is authorized to hire dredge boats or handrakers and to set the rate of payment. Any transferred shellfish may be sold by the director, and the proceeds of that sale retained under the control of the director for the purpose of assisting in the cost of the transfer of shellfish from uncertified waters to approved areas, from time to time, as the transfer becomes necessary or expedient.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 32; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 42, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 16.

20-6-29.
Penalty for improper taking of transferred shellfish.

Any person violating rules or regulations promulgated by the director of environmental management as provided for in §§

20-6-26

—

20-6-28

, shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-6-30.
Shellfishing prohibitions — Use of SCUBA.

It is hereby prohibited to take shellfish by the use of a self-contained underwater breathing apparatus (SCUBA) from Green Hill Pond, Quonochontaug Pond, Charlestown Pond, and Potters Pond.

Penalty. Any person convicted of taking shellfish as set forth in subsection (a) shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 412, § 1.